Utah statutes.
58-60-508.   Core functions of the mental health therapist supervisor.

(1)  Each supervisor of licensed substance abuse counselors shall:

(a)  be a licensed mental health therapist qualified by education and experience to treat substance abuse;

(b)  be currently working in the substance abuse treatment field;

(c)  review substance abuse counselor assessment procedures;

(d)  provide substance abuse diagnosis and other mental health diagnoses in accordance with Subsection 58-60-102(7);

(e)  participate in the development of a treatment plan;

(f)  approve the treatment plan; and

(g)  provide direct supervision for not more than five persons, unless granted an exception in writing from the board and the division.

(2)  Each supervisor of a certified substance abuse counselor, certified substance abuse counselor intern, or certified substance abuse counselor extern shall:

(a) (i)  be a licensed substance abuse counselor with:

(A)  until July 1, 2011, at least one year of experience as a licensed substance abuse counselor; or

(B)  beginning on July 1, 2011, at least two years of experience as a licensed substance abuse counselor; or

(ii)  be a licensed mental health therapist qualified by education and experience to treat substance abuse;

(b)  be currently working in the substance abuse field; and

(c)  provide direct supervision for no more than three persons, unless granted an exception in writing from the board and the division.

